Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-6,126
Federal funding; department; duties.

(1) The department shall work collaboratively with the designated health information exchange to access funding through federal programs, which shall include, but not be limited to, the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, and the Health Resources and Services Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, and other federal programs related to health information, technology, population health, and health care delivery system initiatives, for purposes of supporting the designated health information exchange and the prescription drug monitoring program.

(2) Nothing in the Population Health Information Act shall preclude the department from working collaboratively with other entities for purposes of collecting and analyzing data to inform the Legislature, the department, health care providers, and health care entities regarding the cost of, access to, and quality of health care in Nebraska.

Laws 2020, LB1183, § 4.